Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 3
SUNDAY CLOSING LAW

44-20-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Motor vehicle" means every self-propelled vehicle intended primarily for use and operation on the public highways and every vehicle intended primarily for operation on the public highways that is not driven or propelled by its own power, but which is designed either to be attached to or become a part of a self-propelled vehicle; it does not include farm tractors and other machines and tools used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 93, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-301 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-302. Sunday closing.

No person, firm, or corporation, whether owner, proprietor, agent, or employee, shall keep open, operate, or assist in keeping open or operating any place or premises or residences, whether open or closed, for the purpose of selling, bartering, or exchanging or offering for sale, barter, or exchange any motor vehicle, whether new, used, or secondhand, on the first day of the week commonly called Sunday. This part 3 shall not apply to the opening of an establishment or place of business on the first day of the week for other purposes, such as the sale of petroleum products, tires, or automobile accessories, or for the purpose of operating and conducting a motor vehicle repair shop, or for the purpose of supplying such services as towing or wrecking. The provisions of this part 3 shall not apply to the opening of an establishment or place of business on the first day of the week for the purpose of selling, bartering, or exchanging or offering for sale, barter, or exchange any boat, boat trailer, snowmobile, or snowmobile trailer.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 93, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-302 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-303. Penalties.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation who violates any of the provisions of this part 3 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than seventy-five dollars nor more than one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or the court, in its discretion, may suspend or revoke the Colorado motor vehicle dealer's license issued under the provisions of part 1 of this article 20, or by such fine and imprisonment and suspension or revocation.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 94, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-303 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-20-304. Repeal of part.

This part 3 is repealed, effective September 1, 2027. Before its repeal, this part 3 is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 94, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-304 as it existed prior to 2018.